Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2997.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 12 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL PROCEDURE" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 34
VETERANS IDENTIFICATION IN THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM
12-34-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rhode Island Veterans Identification
in the Criminal Justice System Act."
12-34-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Accountability courts" means the veterans treatment courts and other specialty courts
(drug, mental health, or family courts).
(2) "Community supervision" means probation or parole under Title 13.
(3) "Diversion programs" means any mechanism applied after charges are filed, including
accountability courts and prosecutor programs.
(4) "Identity attributes for individuals" means and includes name, date of birth, Social
Security Number, and gender.
(5) "Law enforcement partners" means and includes police departments, sheriff
departments, courts, jails, and deflection initiatives collaborating with law enforcement.

(6) "Local deflection initiative" means a community-based coalition assisting individuals
with substance use disorder, mental health disorder, or co-occurring disorders via connection with
local behavioral health systems following contact with law enforcement.
(7) "Status query and response exchange system" or "SQUARES" means a web application
of the VA providing verified information about veteran status, eligibility for healthcare, and VA
programs.
(8) "Veterans justice outreach program" means the VA office charged with early
identification of justice-involved veterans and facilitating access to services.
(9) "Veterans justice outreach specialists" means VA representatives tasked with
identifying justice-involved veterans, conducting outreach, facilitating access to VA and other
services, and providing case management.
(10) "Veterans reentry search service" or "VRSS" means the secure database maintained
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs enabling correctional and criminal justice
entities to identify veterans.
(11) "Veteran sentencing option" means a statutory provision where disposition is
postponed pending completion of a therapeutic case plan administered by a judge and community
supervision.
12-34-3. Definition of "veteran" for criminal justice system.
(1) For purposes of identification in the Rhode Island criminal justice system, a "veteran"
is a person who:
(i) Swore an oath and entered any branch of the Armed Forces, including the National
Guard or Reserves, and is:
(ii) Currently serving; or
(iii) Was discharged, that was not a dishonorable discharge, unless the individual with a
dishonorable discharge has been diagnosed with substance use disorder, military sexual trauma,
traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, or another mental health condition.
(2) This definition does not affect veteran status for any other purpose and does not create
additional rights or benefits.
12-34-4. Law enforcement applicability.
(a) Within twenty-four (24) hours of any law enforcement contact, with or without an
arrest, the administrator of the local law enforcement department shall:
(1) Provide necessary information for verification through SQUARES to the Rhode Island
department of veterans services (RIVETS), if applicable, to verify the veteran status of all
individuals who have made contact with law enforcement.
LC005518 - Page 2 of 5

(i) The administrator may coordinate with the RIVETS to ensure verification.
(ii) In the absence of the administrator shall request the veterans justice outreach specialist
to conduct verification of veteran status.
(2) In the absence of a designated partner as in subsection (a)(1) of this section, the local
law enforcement department shall conduct verification using VRSS or similar federal service, or
request verification from a veterans justice outreach specialist.
(b) Each week, RIVETS shall submit a report identifying each individual whose veteran
status was verified during the previous week to:
(1) The Rhode Island department of veterans services under title 42;
(2) The nearest veterans justice outreach specialist;
(3) The court where charges are pending;
(4) Judge, prosecuting attorney, managing public defender, and the veteran-client's
attorney of record; and
(5) Coordinator of any specialty court program authorized by the Rhode Island supreme
court.
(c) The administrator shall provide veteran arrestees or inmates reasonable access to:
(1) Deflection initiative personnel;
(2) Rhode Island department of veterans services;
(3) VA representatives to facilitate applications for:
(i) Identification and referral to community resources;
(ii) Federal or state benefits or compensation;
(iii) Treatment through veterans treatment specialty courts or other accountability courts;
(iv) Diversion programs other than accountability courts;
(v) Veteran sentencing option; and
(vi) Sentencing mitigation.
(d) Notify veteran arrestees and inmates about assigned veterans justice outreach
specialists.
(e) Verified veteran status shall be shared with the judge, prosecutor, managing public
defender, veteran’s attorney, and specialty court coordinator.
SECTION 2. Chapter 13-8 of the General Laws entitled "Parole" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
13-8-32.1. Community supervision applicability -- Veterans.
(a) Within twenty-one (21) days of community supervision sentence or start date, the
administrator or designee, of Rhode Island probation or parole, or the RIVETS shall:
LC005518 - Page 3 of 5

(1) Verify veteran status using VRSS or a similar service;
(2) Notify verified veterans of assigned veterans justice outreach specialists;
(3) Allow verified veterans in-person or video access to VA or county veterans service
coordinators;
(4) Assist verified veterans in applying for federal benefits, including mailing applications
on behalf of the supervisee;
(5) Submit weekly reports of verified supervisees to Rhode Island department of veterans
services.
SECTION 3. Chapter 42-56 of the General Laws entitled "Corrections Department" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-56-43. Administration of veteran status.
(a) Within seven (7) days of intake, the director of the correctional facility, designee, or
RIVETS shall:
(1) Verify veteran status using VRSS or similar service;
(2) Assist verified veteran inmates with federal benefits and applications;
(3) Submit weekly reports of newly verified veteran inmates to the Rhode Island
department of veterans services, and relevant courts;
(4) Allow in-person or video visitation with VA or veteran coordinators at no cost.
(b) Administrators shall notify the VA in writing by mail, email, or fax between sixty-one
(61) and ninety (90) days of initial incarceration for felony veterans still in custody.
(c) Administrators shall notify the VA within seven (7) days of release from custody for
inmates incarcerated more than sixty (60) days.
(d) Verified veteran status shall be shared with the judge, prosecutor, managing public
defender, veteran’s attorney, and specialty court coordinator.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005518
========
LC005518 - Page 4 of 5